src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_vahe_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - iše: # ok VAHE
    iše+N+Sg+Nom:  iše
    iše+N+Sg+Gen:  iše
    iše+N+Sg+Acc: iše
    iše+N+Sg+Ill:  išán
    iše+N+Sg+Loc:  iššeest
    iše+N+Sg+Com:  iššijn # MM
    iše+N+Sg+Abe:  išettáá
    iše+N+Ess:  iššeen
    iše+N+Par: iššeed
    iše+N+Pl+Nom:  išeh
    iše+N+Pl+Gen: [iišij, išij]
    iše+N+Pl+Acc:  iišijd
    iše+N+Pl+Ill:  [iišijd, iššijd] # MM  iišijd hardcoded
    iše+N+Pl+Loc:  iišijn
    iše+N+Pl+Com:  [išijguin, išijgijn]
    iše+N+Pl+Abe:  išijttáá

  Noun - vahe: # ok VAHE
    vahe+N+Sg+Nom: vahe
    vahe+N+Sg+Gen: vave
    vahe+N+Sg+Acc: vave
    vahe+N+Sg+Ill: vahan
    vahe+N+Sg+Loc: vavveest
    vahe+N+Sg+Com: vovvijn
    vahe+N+Sg+Abe: vavettáá
    vahe+N+Ess: vahheen
    vahe+N+Par: vahheed
    vahe+N+Pl+Nom: vaveh
    vahe+N+Pl+Gen: [voovij, vovij]
    vahe+N+Pl+Acc: voovijd
    vahe+N+Pl+Ill: vovvijd
    vahe+N+Pl+Loc: voovijn
    vahe+N+Pl+Com: [vovijguin, vovijgijn]
    vahe+N+Pl+Abe: vovijttáá
    vahe+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: vahhaam
    vahe+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: vahhaad
    vahe+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: vahhees
    vahe+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: vahhaan
    vahe+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: vahhaad
    vahe+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: vavvees

  Noun - ahe: # ok VAHE
    ahe+N+Sg+Nom:  ahe
    ahe+N+Sg+Gen:  ave
    ahe+N+Sg+Acc:  ave
    ahe+N+Sg+Ill:  ahan
    ahe+N+Sg+Loc:  avveest
    ahe+N+Sg+Com:  ovvijn
    ahe+N+Sg+Abe:  avettáá
    ahe+N+Ess:  ahheen
    ahe+N+Par: ahheed
    ahe+N+Pl+Nom:  aveh
    ahe+N+Pl+Gen: [oovij, ovij]
    ahe+N+Pl+Acc:  oovijd
    ahe+N+Pl+Ill:  ovvijd
    ahe+N+Pl+Loc:  oovijn
    ahe+N+Pl+Com:  [ovijguin, ovijgijn]
    ahe+N+Pl+Abe:  ovijttáá

  Noun - njihe: # ok VAHE
    njihe+N+Sg+Nom:  njihe
    njihe+N+Sg+Gen:  njive
    njihe+N+Sg+Acc:  njive
    njihe+N+Sg+Ill:  njihán
    njihe+N+Sg+Loc:  njivveest
    njihe+N+Sg+Com:  njivvijn
    njihe+N+Sg+Abe:  njivettáá
    njihe+N+Ess:  njihheen
    njihe+N+Par:  njihheed
    njihe+N+Pl+Nom:  njiveh
    njihe+N+Pl+Gen:  [njiivij, njivij]
    njihe+N+Pl+Acc:  njiivijd
    njihe+N+Pl+Ill:  njivvijd
    njihe+N+Pl+Loc:  njiivijn
    njihe+N+Pl+Com:  [njivijguin, njivijgijn]
    njihe+N+Pl+Abe:  njivijttáá
